Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 10
DISCRIMINATION AND UNFAIR COMPETITION IN BUYING AND SELLING DAIRY PRODUCTS

Sec.

§ 37-1001. Discrimination by buying at higher price — Prima facie evidence

Grades of cream. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1002. Discrimination by selling at lower price

Unfair discrimination defined. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1003. Special rebates, collateral contracts, and other devices. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1003a. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1003b. Unfair and unlawful practices enumerated. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1003c — 37-1003f. Refrigeration facilities — Equipment — Sale — Competitive, conditions — Permissive practices — Collusion or joint participation prohibited. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1004. Penalties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1005. Duty of director of department of agriculture. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1006. Prosecutions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1007. Person injured may maintain action. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1008. Prohibited contracts void. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1009. Revocation of corporate charter. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1010. Separability. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1011. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1012. Unlawful marketing practices in connection with sale of dairy products

Exceptions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1013. Violation a misdemeanor

Penalty. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1014. Enjoining violations — Costs

Damages. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-1015. Trade association may maintain action. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.